New Jersey, session 222, A1106.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The State song shall be the words and music of the song entitled New Jersey State Song, composed by Dr. Violet Barrett Paterson. The Secretary of State shall maintain the printed music or sound recordings of the designated song in the State Library, or in another suitable archive, as a resource for the people of New Jersey. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.